District of Columbia statutes.
5-1409

Examination; further investigation and autopsy.

(a)

If, in the opinion of the CME, the cause and manner of death are established with a reasonable medical certainty, the CME shall complete a report of the medical examination of the decedent.

(b)

If, in the opinion of the CME, or the United States Attorney, further investigation as to the cause or manner of death is required or the public interest so requires, a medical examiner shall either perform, or the CME shall arrange for a qualified pathologist to perform, an autopsy on the body of the decedent and to retain tissues and biological specimens deemed necessary to an investigation. No consent of the next of kin shall be required for an autopsy to be performed under this section.

(c)

The medical examiner performing the autopsy shall make a complete record of the findings and conclusions of any autopsy and shall prepare a report thereon.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2910, 47 DCR 6308
1981 Ed., § 11-2306.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2910 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).